Utah statutes.
58-77-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1) (a)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.

(b)  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless the individual renews it in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

(3)  At the time of renewal, the licensed Direct-entry midwife shall be in current compliance with the requirements of Section 58-77-302.



Enacted by Chapter 299, 2005 General Session

